Utah statutes.
78B-10a-107.   Decision -- Award -- Court action.

(1)  A written decision by a single arbitrator or by a majority of the arbitration panel shall constitute a final decision.

(2)  An arbitration award issued in accordance with this chapter shall be the final resolution of all property damage or bodily injury claims between the parties and may be reduced to judgment by the court upon motion and notice unless:

(a)  either party, within 20 days after service of the arbitration award:

(i)  files a notice requesting a trial de novo in the district court; and

(ii)  serves the nonmoving party with a copy of the notice requesting a trial de novo; or

(b)  the arbitration award has been satisfied.



Enacted by Chapter 197, 2011 General Session

